Washington statutes.
RCW 19.25.810

Chapter not applicable to certain nonrecorded broadcast use.

This chapter shall not be applicable to any recording that is received in the ordinary course of a broadcast by a commercial or educational radio or television station where no recording is made of the broadcast.

[ 1991 c 38 s 7.]